test/src/morphology/V-pueuedmae82_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `püüdmä: # Verb (82) `püüdmä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `püüdmä+V+Inf/mA: `püüdmä
     `püüdmä+V+Inf: (`)püüdäq
     `püüdmä+V+ActPrtPrc: `püüdnüq
     `püüdmä+V+PssPrtPrc: püvvet
     `püüdmä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: püvvä
     `püüdmä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: püüd
     `püüdmä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [püvvi, `püüdse]
     `püüdmä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [püüdʼ, `püüdse]
